scripts/g2p.twolc
!! ============================================================================
!"Voice Assimilation: Consonant clusters with unvoiced consonant at end of the cluster"
!TODO: В doesn't force softness assimilation, conflicts with softness assimilations
!Cx:Cy <=>  _ :UnvoicedCSH ;
!where Cx in ( Б Б' б б' В В' в в' Г Г' г г' Д Д' д д' Ж ж З З' з з' )
!      Cy in ( П П' п п' Ф Ф' ф ф' К К' к к' Т Т' т т' Ш ш С С' с с' )
!  matched ;
!
!! ============================================================================
!"Voice Assimilation: Consonant clusters with voiced consonant at end of the cluster"
!Cx:Cy <=>  _ :VoicedCSH ;
!TODO: conflicts with softness assimilations
!where Cx in ( П П' п п' Ф Ф' ф ф' К К' к к' Т Т' т т' Ш ш С С' с с' )
!      Cy in ( Б Б' б б' В В' в в' Г Г' г г' Д Д' д д' Ж ж З З' з з' )
!  matched ;
!
!! ============================================================================
"Softness Assimilation: Dentals"
Cx:Cy <=> _ :DenS ;
where Cx in ( Д  д  З  з  Л  л  Н  н  Р  р  С  с  Т  т  )
      Cy in ( Д' д' З' з' Л' л' Н' н' Р' р' С' с' Т' т' )
    matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Softness Assimilation: Labials"
Cx:Cy <=> _ :LabS ;
where Cx in ( Б  б  В  в  М  м  П  п  Ф  ф  )
      Cy in ( Б' б' В' в' М' м' П' п' Ф' ф' )
    matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Softness Assimilation: Velar"
Cx:Cy <=> _ :VelS ;
where Cx in ( Г  г  К  к  Х  х  )
      Cy in ( Г' г' К' к' Х' х' )
    matched ;

!! ============================================================================
!"Conversion of { ого его } in endings to { ово 'эво }"
!TODO: Do we just list out several words that change this way?

!! ============================================================================
!"Conversion of { тс } in endings { ятся } to { ц }"
!TODO:
